Washington statutes.
RCW 19.94.260

Rejection—Seizure for use as evidence—Entry of premises—Search warrant.

(1) With respect to the enforcement of this chapter and any other acts dealing with weights and measures that he or she is, or may be empowered to enforce, the director or a city sealer may reject or seize for use as evidence incorrect weighing or measuring instruments or devices or packages of commodities to be used, retained, offered, exposed for sale, or sold in violation of the law.

(2) In the performance of his or her official duties conferred under this chapter, the director or a city sealer is authorized at reasonable times during the normal business hours of the person using a weighing or measuring instrument or device to enter into or upon any structure or premises where such weighing or measuring instrument or device is used or kept for commercial purposes. If the director or a city sealer is denied access to any premises or establishment where such access was sought for the purposes set forth in this chapter, the director or a city sealer may apply to any court of competent jurisdiction for a search warrant authorizing access to such premises or establishment for such purposes. The court may, upon such application, issue the search warrant for the purposes requested.

[ 1992 c 237 s 18; 1991 sp.s. c 23 s 11; 1969 c 67 s 26.]

NOTES:

Legislative findings—Intent—1991 sp.s. c 23: See notes following RCW 19.94.150.